Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. REGULATION OF LAND USE, STRUCTURES, BUSINESSES, AND RELATED ACTIVITIES

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL REGULATORY AUTHORITY

CHAPTER 212. MUNICIPAL REGULATION OF SUBDIVISIONS AND PROPERTY DEVELOPMENT

SUBCHAPTER A. REGULATION OF SUBDIVISIONS

Sec. 212.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Extraterritorial jurisdiction" means a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction as determined under Chapter 42, except that for a municipality that has a population of 5,000 or more and is located in a county bordering the Rio Grande River, "extraterritorial jurisdiction" means the area outside the municipal limits but within five miles of those limits.

(2) "Plat" includes a preliminary plat, final plat, and replat.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0015. CONSTRUCTION OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter may not be construed to restrict a municipality from establishing a submittal calendar to be used by an applicant to facilitate compliance with the approval process described by Sections 212.009, 212.0091, 212.0093, and 212.0095.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.002. RULES. After a public hearing on the matter, the governing body of a municipality may adopt rules governing plats and subdivisions of land within the municipality's jurisdiction to promote the health, safety, morals, or general welfare of the municipality and the safe, orderly, and healthful development of the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.0021. SUBDIVISION REQUIREMENTS. The governing body of a municipality, by ordinance and after notice is published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, may:

(1) adopt, based on the amount and kind of travel over each street or road in a subdivision, reasonable specifications relating to the construction of each street or road; and

(2) adopt reasonable specifications to provide adequate drainage for each street or road in a subdivision in accordance with standard engineering practices.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0025. CHAPTER-WIDE PROVISION RELATING TO REGULATION OF PLATS AND SUBDIVISIONS IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. The authority of a municipality under this chapter relating to the regulation of plats or subdivisions in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction is subject to any applicable limitation prescribed by an agreement under Section 242.001.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 523, Sec. 6, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 212.003. EXTENSION OF RULES TO EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. (a) The governing body of a municipality by ordinance may extend to the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality the application of municipal ordinances adopted under Section 212.002 and other municipal ordinances relating to access to public roads or the pumping, extraction, and use of groundwater by persons other than retail public utilities, as defined by Section 13.002, Water Code, for the purpose of preventing the use or contact with groundwater that presents an actual or potential threat to human health. However, unless otherwise authorized by state law, in its extraterritorial jurisdiction a municipality shall not regulate:

(1) the use of any building or property for business, industrial, residential, or other purposes;

(2) the bulk, height, or number of buildings constructed on a particular tract of land;

(3) the size of a building that can be constructed on a particular tract of land, including without limitation any restriction on the ratio of building floor space to the land square footage;

(4) the number of residential units that can be built per acre of land; or

(5) the size, type, or method of construction of a water or wastewater facility that can be constructed to serve a developed tract of land if:

(A) the facility meets the minimum standards established for water or wastewater facilities by state and federal regulatory entities; and

(B) the developed tract of land is:

(i) located in a county with a population of 2.8 million or more; and

(ii) served by:

(a) on-site septic systems constructed before September 1, 2001, that fail to provide adequate services; or

(b) on-site water wells constructed before September 1, 2001, that fail to provide an adequate supply of safe drinking water.

(b) A fine or criminal penalty prescribed by the ordinance does not apply to a violation in the extraterritorial jurisdiction.

(c) The municipality is entitled to appropriate injunctive relief in district court to enjoin a violation of municipal ordinances or codes applicable in the extraterritorial jurisdiction.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 822, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 68, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 731, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 212.004. PLAT REQUIRED. (a) The owner of a tract of land located within the limits or in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality who divides the tract in two or more parts to lay out a subdivision of the tract, including an addition to a municipality, to lay out suburban, building, or other lots, or to lay out streets, alleys, squares, parks, or other parts of the tract intended by the owner of the tract to be dedicated to public use must have a plat of the subdivision prepared. A division of a tract under this subsection includes a division regardless of whether it is made by using a metes and bounds description in a deed of conveyance or in a contract for a deed, by using a contract of sale or other executory contract to convey, or by using any other method. A division of land under this subsection does not include a division of land into parts greater than five acres, where each part has access and no public improvement is being dedicated.

(b) To be recorded, the plat must:

(1) describe the subdivision by metes and bounds;

(2) locate the subdivision with respect to a corner of the survey or tract or an original corner of the original survey of which it is a part; and

(3) state the dimensions of the subdivision and of each street, alley, square, park, or other part of the tract intended by the owner of the tract to be dedicated to public use.

(c) The owner or proprietor of the tract or the owner's or proprietor's agent must acknowledge the plat in the manner required for the acknowledgment of deeds.

(d) The plat must be filed and recorded with the county clerk of the county in which the tract is located.

(e) The plat is subject to the filing and recording provisions of Section 12.002, Property Code.

(f) A plat is considered filed on the date the applicant submits the plat, along with a completed plat application and the application fees and other requirements prescribed by or under this subchapter, to:

(1) the governing body of the municipality; or

(2) the municipal authority responsible for approving plats.

(g) The governing body of a municipality or the municipal authority responsible for approving plats may not require an analysis, study, document, agreement, or similar requirement to be included in or as part of an application for a plat, development permit, or subdivision of land that is not explicitly allowed by state law.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1046, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0045. EXCEPTION TO PLAT REQUIREMENT: MUNICIPAL DETERMINATION. (a) To determine whether specific divisions of land are required to be platted, a municipality may define and classify the divisions. A municipality need not require platting for every division of land otherwise within the scope of this subchapter.

(b) In lieu of a plat contemplated by this subchapter, a municipality may require the filing of a development plat under Subchapter B if that subchapter applies to the municipality.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 212.0046. EXCEPTION TO PLAT REQUIREMENT: CERTAIN PROPERTY ABUTTING AIRCRAFT RUNWAY. An owner of a tract of land is not required to prepare a plat if the land:

(1) is located wholly within a municipality with a population of 5,000 or less;

(2) is divided into parts larger than 2-1/2 acres; and

(3) abuts any part of an aircraft runway.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 212.005. APPROVAL BY MUNICIPALITY REQUIRED. (a) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats must approve a plat or replat that is required to be prepared under this subchapter and that satisfies the requirements of this subchapter.

(b) This subchapter may not be construed to convey any authority to a municipality regarding the completeness of an application or the approval of a plat or replat that is not explicitly granted by this subchapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1046, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.006. AUTHORITY RESPONSIBLE FOR APPROVAL GENERALLY. (a) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats under this subchapter is the municipal planning commission or, if the municipality has no planning commission, the governing body of the municipality. The governing body by ordinance may require the approval of the governing body in addition to that of the municipal planning commission.

(b) In a municipality with a population of more than 1.5 million, at least two members of the municipal planning commission, but not more than 25 percent of the membership of the commission, must be residents of the area outside the limits of the municipality and in which the municipality exercises its authority to approve subdivision plats.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 212.0065. DELEGATION OF APPROVAL RESPONSIBILITY.

(a) The governing body of a municipality or the municipal planning commission may delegate to one or more officers or employees of the municipality or of a utility owned or operated by the municipality the ability to approve, approve with conditions, or disapprove a plat.

(b) The designated person or persons may, for any reason, elect to present the plat for approval to the municipal authority responsible for approving plats.

(c) An applicant has the right to appeal to the governing body of the municipality or the municipal planning commission if the designated person disapproves a plat.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 345, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 92, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 566, Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1130, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 402, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 316 (H.B. 2281), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.007. AUTHORITY RESPONSIBLE FOR APPROVAL: TRACT IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION OF MORE THAN ONE MUNICIPALITY. (a) For a tract located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of more than one municipality, the authority responsible for approving a plat under this subchapter is the authority in the municipality with the largest population that under Section 212.006 has approval responsibility. The governing body of that municipality may enter into an agreement with any other affected municipality or with any other municipality having area that, if unincorporated, would be in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the governing body's municipality delegating to the other municipality the responsibility for plat approval within specified parts of the affected area.

(b) Either party to an agreement under Subsection (a) may revoke the agreement after 20 years have elapsed after the date of the agreement unless the parties agree to a shorter period.

(c) A copy of the agreement shall be filed with the county clerk.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.008. APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL. A person desiring approval of a plat must apply to and file a copy of the plat with the municipal planning commission or, if the municipality has no planning commission, the governing body of the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.0081. REQUIRED APPLICATION MATERIALS. (a) Each municipality to which this subchapter applies shall adopt and make available to the public a complete, written list of all documentation and other information that the municipality requires to be submitted with a plat application. The required documentation and other information must be related to a requirement authorized under this subchapter.

(b) An application submitted to the municipal authority responsible for approving plats that contains all documents and other information on the list provided under Subsection (a) is considered complete.

(c) A municipality that operates an Internet website shall publish and continuously maintain the list described by Subsection (a) on the Internet website not later than the 30th day after the date the municipality adopts or amends the list.

(d) A municipality that does not operate an Internet website shall publish the list described by Subsection (a) on adoption of the list or an amendment to the list in:

(1) a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality; and

(2) a public place in the location in which the governing body of the municipality meets.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0085. APPROVAL PROCEDURE: APPLICABILITY. The approval procedures under this subchapter apply to a municipality regardless of whether the municipality has entered into an interlocal agreement, including an interlocal agreement between a municipality and county under Section 242.001(d).

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 212.009. APPROVAL PROCEDURE: INITIAL APPROVAL. (a) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats shall approve, approve with conditions, or disapprove a plat within 30 days after the date the plat is filed. A plat is approved by the municipal authority unless it is disapproved within that period and in accordance with Section 212.0091.

(b) If an ordinance requires that a plat be approved by the governing body of the municipality in addition to the planning commission, the governing body shall approve, approve with conditions, or disapprove the plat within 30 days after the date the plat is approved by the planning commission or is approved by the inaction of the commission. A plat is approved by the governing body unless it is disapproved within that period and in accordance with Section 212.0091.

(b-1) Notwithstanding Subsection (a) or (b), if a groundwater availability certification is required under Section 212.0101, the 30-day period described by those subsections begins on the date the applicant submits the groundwater availability certification to the municipal authority responsible for approving plats or the governing body of the municipality, as applicable.

(b-2) Notwithstanding Subsection (a) or (b), the parties shall extend the 30-day period described by those subsections for one or more periods, each not to exceed 30 days if:

(1) both:

(A) the applicant requests the extension in writing to the municipal authority responsible for approving plats or the governing body of the municipality, as applicable; and

(B) the municipal authority or governing body, as applicable, approves the extension request; or

(2) Chapter 2007, Government Code, requires the municipality to perform a takings impact assessment in connection with the plan or plat.

(c) If a plat is approved, the municipal authority giving the approval shall endorse the plat with a certificate indicating the approval. The certificate must be signed by:

(1) the authority's presiding officer and attested by the authority's secretary; or

(2) a majority of the members of the authority.

(d) If the municipal authority responsible for approving plats fails to approve, approve with conditions, or disapprove a plat within the prescribed period, the authority on the applicant's request shall issue a certificate stating the date the plat was filed and that the authority failed to act on the plat within the period. The certificate is effective in place of the endorsement required by Subsection (c).

(e) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats shall maintain a record of each application made to the authority and the authority's action taken on it. On request of an owner of an affected tract, the authority shall certify the reasons for the action taken on an application.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0091. APPROVAL PROCEDURE: CONDITIONAL APPROVAL OR DISAPPROVAL REQUIREMENTS. (a) A municipal authority or governing body that conditionally approves or disapproves a plat under this subchapter shall provide the applicant a written statement of the conditions for the conditional approval or reasons for disapproval that clearly articulates each specific condition for the conditional approval or reason for disapproval.

(b) Each condition or reason specified in the written statement:

(1) must:

(A) be directly related to the requirements under this subchapter; and

(B) include a citation to the law, including a statute or municipal ordinance, that is the basis for the conditional approval or disapproval, if applicable; and

(2) may not be arbitrary.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0093. APPROVAL PROCEDURE: APPLICANT RESPONSE TO CONDITIONAL APPROVAL OR DISAPPROVAL. After the conditional approval or disapproval of a plat under Section 212.0091, the applicant may submit to the municipal authority or governing body that conditionally approved or disapproved the plat a written response that satisfies each condition for the conditional approval or remedies each reason for disapproval provided. The municipal authority or governing body may not establish a deadline for an applicant to submit the response.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0095. APPROVAL PROCEDURE: APPROVAL OR DISAPPROVAL OF RESPONSE. (a) A municipal authority or governing body that receives a response under Section 212.0093 shall determine whether to approve or disapprove the applicant's previously conditionally approved or disapproved plat not later than the 15th day after the date the response was submitted.

(b) A municipal authority or governing body that conditionally approves or disapproves a plat following the submission of a response under Section 212.0093:

(1) must comply with Section 212.0091; and

(2) may disapprove the plat only for a specific condition or reason provided to the applicant under Section 212.0091.

(c) A municipal authority or governing body that receives a response under Section 212.0093 shall approve a previously conditionally approved or disapproved plat if the response adequately addresses each condition of the conditional approval or each reason for the disapproval.

(d) A previously conditionally approved or disapproved plat is approved if:

(1) the applicant filed a response that meets the requirements of Subsection (c); and

(2) the municipal authority or governing body that received the response does not disapprove the plat on or before the date required by Subsection (a) and in accordance with Section 212.0091.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0096. APPROVAL PROCEDURE: ALTERNATIVE APPROVAL PROCESS. (a) Notwithstanding Sections 212.009, 212.0091, 212.0093, and 212.0095, an applicant may elect at any time to seek approval for a plat under an alternative approval process adopted by a municipality if the process allows for a shorter approval period than the approval process described by Sections 212.009, 212.0091, 212.0093, and 212.0095.

(b) An applicant that elects to seek approval under the alternative approval process described by Subsection (a) is not:

(1) required to satisfy the requirements of Sections 212.009, 212.0091, 212.0093, and 212.0095 before bringing an action challenging a disapproval of a plat under this subchapter; and

(2) prejudiced in any manner in bringing the action described by Subdivision (1), including satisfying a requirement to exhaust any and all remedies.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0097. APPROVAL PROCEDURE: WAIVER PROHIBITED. A municipal authority responsible for approving plats or the governing body of a municipality may not request or require an applicant to waive a deadline or other approval procedure under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 212.0099. JUDICIAL REVIEW OF DISAPPROVAL. In a legal action challenging a disapproval of a plat under this subchapter, the municipality has the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that the disapproval meets the requirements of this subchapter or any applicable case law. The court may not use a deferential standard.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.010. STANDARDS FOR APPROVAL. (a) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats shall approve a plat if:

(1) it conforms to the general plan of the municipality and its current and future streets, alleys, parks, playgrounds, and public utility facilities;

(2) it conforms to the general plan for the extension of the municipality and its roads, streets, and public highways within the municipality and in its extraterritorial jurisdiction, taking into account access to and extension of sewer and water mains and the instrumentalities of public utilities;

(3) a bond required under Section 212.0106, if applicable, is filed with the municipality; and

(4) it conforms to any rules adopted under Section 212.002.

(b) However, the municipal authority responsible for approving plats may not approve a plat unless the plat and other documents have been prepared as required by Section 212.0105, if applicable.

(c) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats may not require the dedication of land within a subdivision for a future street or alley that is:

(1) not intended by the owner of the tract; and

(2) not included, funded, and approved in:

(A) a capital improvement plan adopted by the municipality; or

(B) a similar plan adopted by a county in which the municipality is located or the state.

(d) A municipal authority responsible for approving plats may not refuse to review a plat or to approve a plat for recordation for failure to identify a corridor, as defined by Section 201.619, Transportation Code, unless the corridor is part of an agreement between the Texas Department of Transportation and a county in which the municipality is located under that section.

(e) If a municipal authority responsible for approving plats fails or refuses to approve a plat that meets the requirements of this subchapter, the owner of the tract that is the subject of the plat may bring an action in a district court in a county in which the tract is located for a writ of mandamus to compel the municipal authority to approve the plat by issuing to the owner applicable approval documentation. The applicant shall recover reasonable attorney's fees and court costs in the action if the applicant prevails. The municipality may recover reasonable attorney's fees and court costs in the action if the municipality prevails and the court finds the action is frivolous.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3699), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.0101. ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS: USE OF GROUNDWATER. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (a-1), a plat application for the subdivision of a tract of land for which the source of the water supply intended for the subdivision is groundwater under that land must have attached to it a statement that:

(1) is prepared by an engineer licensed to practice in this state or a geoscientist licensed to practice in this state; and

(2) certifies that adequate groundwater is available for the subdivision.

(a-1) A municipal authority responsible for approving plats may waive the requirement prescribed by Subsection (a) that a plat application have attached to it a statement described by that subsection if:

(1) based on credible evidence of groundwater availability in the vicinity of the proposed subdivision, the municipal authority determines that sufficient groundwater is available and will continue to be available to the subdivided tract of land; and

(2) either:

(A) the entire tract proposed to be subdivided by the plat will be supplied with groundwater from the Gulf Coast Aquifer or the Carrizo-Wilcox Aquifer; or

(B) the proposed subdivision divides the tract into not more than 10 parts.

(a-2) A person subject to a waiver authorized by Subsection (a-1)(2)(B) regarding a subdivided tract of land must comply with the requirements of Subsection (a) if:

(1) the tract is subsequently divided in a manner that results in the original tract being subdivided into more than 10 parts; or

(2) the municipal authority determines that the proposed subdivision is part of a series of proposed subdivisions from an original tract that collectively includes more than 10 parts.

(b) The Texas Commission on Environmental Quality by rule shall establish the appropriate form and content of a certification to be attached to a plat application under this section.

(c) The Texas Commission on Environmental Quality, in consultation with the Texas Water Development Board, by rule shall require a person who submits a plat under Subsection (a) to transmit to the Texas Water Development Board and any groundwater conservation district that includes in the district's boundaries any part of the subdivision information that would be useful in:

(1) performing groundwater conservation district activities;

(2) conducting regional water planning;

(3) maintaining the state's groundwater database; or

(4) conducting studies for the state related to groundwater.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 460, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 99, Sec. 2(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 515 (S.B. 662), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.29, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (S.B. 2440), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2024.

Sec. 212.0105. WATER AND SEWER REQUIREMENTS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only to a person who:

(1) is the owner of a tract of land in a county in which a political subdivision that is eligible for and has applied for financial assistance through Subchapter K, Chapter 17, Water Code;

(2) divides the tract in a manner that creates any lots that are intended for residential purposes and are five acres or less; and

(3) is required under this subchapter to have a plat prepared for the subdivision.

(b) The owner of the tract:

(1) must:

(A) include on the plat or have attached to the plat a document containing a description of the water and sewer service facilities that will be constructed or installed to service the subdivision and a statement of the date by which the facilities will be fully operable; and

(B) have attached to the plat a document prepared by an engineer registered to practice in this state certifying that the water and sewer service facilities described by the plat or on the document attached to the plat are in compliance with the model rules adopted under Section 16.343, Water Code; or

(2) must:

(A) include on the plat a statement that water and sewer service facilities are unnecessary for the subdivision; and

(B) have attached to the plat a document prepared by an engineer registered to practice in this state certifying that water and sewer service facilities are unnecessary for the subdivision under the model rules adopted under Section 16.343, Water Code.

(c) The governing body of the municipality may extend, beyond the date specified on the plat or on the document attached to the plat, the date by which the water and sewer service facilities must be fully operable if the governing body finds the extension is reasonable and not contrary to the public interest. If the facilities are fully operable before the expiration of the extension period, the facilities are considered to have been made fully operable in a timely manner. An extension is not reasonable if it would allow a residence in the subdivision to be inhabited without water or sewer services.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 422, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 927 (H.B. 467), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.0106. BOND REQUIREMENTS AND OTHER FINANCIAL GUARANTEES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only to a person described by Section 212.0105(a).

(b) If the governing body of a municipality in a county described by Section 212.0105(a)(1)(A) or (B) requires the owner of the tract to execute a bond, the owner must do so before subdividing the tract unless an alternative financial guarantee is provided under Subsection (c). The bond must:

(1) be payable to the presiding officer of the governing body or to the presiding officer's successors in office;

(2) be in an amount determined by the governing body to be adequate to ensure the proper construction or installation of the water and sewer service facilities to service the subdivision but not to exceed the estimated cost of the construction or installation of the facilities;

(3) be executed with sureties as may be approved by the governing body;

(4) be executed by a company authorized to do business as a surety in this state if the governing body requires a surety bond executed by a corporate surety; and

(5) be conditioned that the water and sewer service facilities will be constructed or installed:

(A) in compliance with the model rules adopted under Section 16.343, Water Code; and

(B) within the time stated on the plat or on the document attached to the plat for the subdivision or within any extension of that time.

(c) In lieu of the bond an owner may deposit cash, a letter of credit issued by a federally insured financial institution, or other acceptable financial guarantee.

(d) If a letter of credit is used, it must:

(1) list as the sole beneficiary the presiding officer of the governing body; and

(2) be conditioned that the water and sewer service facilities will be constructed or installed:

(A) in compliance with the model rules adopted under Section 16.343, Water Code; and

(B) within the time stated on the plat or on the document attached to the plat for the subdivision or within any extension of that time.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 212.011. EFFECT OF APPROVAL ON DEDICATION. (a) The approval of a plat is not considered an acceptance of any proposed dedication and does not impose on the municipality any duty regarding the maintenance or improvement of any dedicated parts until the appropriate municipal authorities make an actual appropriation of the dedicated parts by entry, use, or improvement.

(b) The disapproval of a plat is considered a refusal by the municipality of the offered dedication indicated on the plat.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.0115. CERTIFICATION REGARDING COMPLIANCE WITH PLAT REQUIREMENTS. (a) For the purposes of this section, land is considered to be within the jurisdiction of a municipality if the land is located within the limits or in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality.

(b) On the approval of a plat by the municipal authority responsible for approving plats, the authority shall issue to the person applying for the approval a certificate stating that the plat has been reviewed and approved by the authority.

(c) On the written request of an owner of land, a purchaser of real property under a contract for deed, executory contract, or other executory conveyance, an entity that provides utility service, or the governing body of the municipality, the municipal authority responsible for approving plats shall make the following determinations regarding the owner's land or the land in which the entity or governing body is interested that is located within the jurisdiction of the municipality:

(1) whether a plat is required under this subchapter for the land; and

(2) if a plat is required, whether it has been prepared and whether it has been reviewed and approved by the authority.

(d) The request made under Subsection (c) must identify the land that is the subject of the request.

(e) If the municipal authority responsible for approving plats determines under Subsection (c) that a plat is not required, the authority shall issue to the requesting party a written certification of that determination. If the authority determines that a plat is required and that the plat has been prepared and has been reviewed and approved by the authority, the authority shall issue to the requesting party a written certification of that determination.

(f) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats shall make its determination within 20 days after the date it receives the request under Subsection (c) and shall issue the certificate, if appropriate, within 10 days after the date the determination is made.

(g) If both the municipal planning commission and the governing body of the municipality have authority to approve plats, only one of those entities need make the determinations and issue the certificates required by this section.

(h) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats may adopt rules it considers necessary to administer its functions under this section.

(i) The governing body of a municipality may delegate, in writing, the ability to perform any of the responsibilities under this section to one or more persons. A binding decision of the person or persons under this subsection is appealable to the municipal authority responsible for approving plats.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 567, Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.012. CONNECTION OF UTILITIES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), (d), or (j), an entity described by Subsection (b) may not serve or connect any land with water, sewer, electricity, gas, or other utility service unless the entity has been presented with or otherwise holds a certificate applicable to the land issued under Section 212.0115.

(b) The prohibition established by Subsection (a) applies only to:

(1) a municipality and officials of a municipality that provides water, sewer, electricity, gas, or other utility service;

(2) a municipally owned or municipally operated utility that provides any of those services;

(3) a public utility that provides any of those services;

(4) a water supply or sewer service corporation organized and operating under Chapter 67, Water Code, that provides any of those services;

(5) a county that provides any of those services; and

(6) a special district or authority created by or under state law that provides any of those services.

(c) An entity described by Subsection (b) may serve or connect land with water, sewer, electricity, gas, or other utility service regardless of whether the entity is presented with or otherwise holds a certificate applicable to the land issued under Section 212.0115 if:

(1) the land is covered by a development plat approved under Subchapter B or under an ordinance or rule relating to the development plat;

(2) the land was first served or connected with service by an entity described by Subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3) before September 1, 1987; or

(3) the land was first served or connected with service by an entity described by Subsection (b)(4), (b)(5), or (b)(6) before September 1, 1989.

(d) In a county to which Subchapter B, Chapter 232, applies, an entity described by Subsection (b) may serve or connect land with water, sewer, electricity, gas, or other utility service that is located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality regardless of whether the entity is presented with or otherwise holds a certificate applicable to the land issued under Section 212.0115, if the municipal authority responsible for approving plats issues a certificate stating that:

(1) the subdivided land:

(A) was sold or conveyed by a subdivider by any means of conveyance, including a contract for deed or executory contract, before:

(i) September 1, 1995, in a county defined under Section 232.022(a)(1);

(ii) September 1, 1999, in a county defined under Section 232.022(a)(1) if, on August 31, 1999, the subdivided land was located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality as determined by Chapter 42; or

(iii) September 1, 2005, in a county defined under Section 232.022(a)(2);

(B) has not been subdivided after September 1, 1995, September 1, 1999, or September 1, 2005, as applicable under Paragraph (A);

(C) is the site of construction of a residence, evidenced by at least the existence of a completed foundation, that was begun on or before:

(i) May 1, 2003, in a county defined under Section 232.022(a)(1); or

(ii) September 1, 2005, in a county defined under Section 232.022(a)(2); and

(D) has had adequate sewer services installed to service the lot or dwelling, as determined by an authorized agent responsible for the licensing or permitting of on-site sewage facilities under Chapter 366, Health and Safety Code;

(2) the subdivided land is a lot of record as defined by Section 232.021(6-a) that is located in a county defined by Section 232.022(a)(1) and has adequate sewer services installed that are fully operable to service the lot or dwelling, as determined by an authorized agent responsible for the licensing or permitting of on-site sewage facilities under Chapter 366, Health and Safety Code; or

(3) the land was not subdivided after September 1, 1995, in a county defined under Section 232.022(a)(1), or September 1, 2005, in a county defined under Section 232.022(a)(2), and:

(A) water service is available within 750 feet of the subdivided land; or

(B) water service is available more than 750 feet from the subdivided land and the extension of water service to the land may be feasible, subject to a final determination by the water service provider.

(e) An entity described by Subsection (b) may provide utility service to land described by Subsection (d)(1), (2), or (3) only if the person requesting service:

(1) is not the land's subdivider or the subdivider's agent; and

(2) provides to the entity a certificate described by Subsection (d).

(f) A person requesting service may obtain a certificate under Subsection (d)(1), (2), or (3) only if the person is the owner or purchaser of the subdivided land and provides to the municipal authority responsible for approving plats documentation containing:

(1) a copy of the means of conveyance or other documents that show that the land was sold or conveyed by a subdivider before September 1, 1995, before September 1, 1999, or before September 1, 2005, as applicable under Subsection (d);

(2) for a certificate issued under Subsection (d)(1), a notarized affidavit by the person requesting service that states that construction of a residence on the land, evidenced by at least the existence of a completed foundation, was begun on or before May 1, 2003, in a county defined by Section 232.022(a)(1) or September 1, 2005, in a county defined by Section 232.022(a)(2), and the request for utility connection or service is to connect or serve a residence described by Subsection (d)(1)(C);

(3) a notarized affidavit by the person requesting service that states that the subdivided land has not been further subdivided after September 1, 1995, September 1, 1999, or September 1, 2005, as applicable under Subsection (d); and

(4) evidence that adequate sewer service or facilities have been installed and are fully operable to service the lot or dwelling from an entity described by Subsection (b) or the authorized agent responsible for the licensing or permitting of on-site sewage facilities under Chapter 366, Health and Safety Code.

(g) On request, the municipal authority responsible for approving plats shall provide to the attorney general and any appropriate local, county, or state law enforcement official a copy of any document on which the municipal authority relied in determining the legality of providing service.

(h) This section may not be construed to abrogate any civil or criminal proceeding or prosecution or to waive any penalty against a subdivider for a violation of a state or local law, regardless of the date on which the violation occurred.

(i) In this section:

(1) "Foundation" means the lowest division of a residence, usually consisting of a masonry slab or a pier and beam structure, that is partly or wholly below the surface of the ground and on which the residential structure rests.

(2) "Subdivider" has the meaning assigned by Section 232.021.

(j) Except as provided by Subsection (k), this section does not prohibit a water or sewer utility from providing in a county defined by Section 232.022(a)(1) water or sewer utility connection or service to a residential dwelling that:

(1) is provided water or wastewater facilities under or in conjunction with a federal or state funding program designed to address inadequate water or wastewater facilities in colonias or to residential lots located in a county described by Section 232.022(a)(1);

(2) is an existing dwelling identified as an eligible recipient for funding by the funding agency providing adequate water and wastewater facilities or improvements;

(3) when connected, will comply with the minimum state standards for both water and sewer facilities and as prescribed by the model subdivision rules adopted under Section 16.343, Water Code; and

(4) is located in a project for which the municipality with jurisdiction over the project or the approval of plats within the project area has approved the improvement project by order, resolution, or interlocal agreement under Chapter 791, Government Code.

(k) A utility may not serve any subdivided land with water utility connection or service under Subsection (j) unless the entity receives a determination that adequate sewer services have been installed to service the lot or dwelling from the municipal authority responsible for approving plats, an entity described by Subsection (b), or the authorized agent responsible for the licensing or permitting of on-site sewage facilities under Chapter 366, Health and Safety Code.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1062, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 18.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 404, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 708 (S.B. 425), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1239 (S.B. 2253), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 212.013. VACATING PLAT. (a) The proprietors of the tract covered by a plat may vacate the plat at any time before any lot in the plat is sold. The plat is vacated when a signed, acknowledged instrument declaring the plat vacated is approved and recorded in the manner prescribed for the original plat.

(b) If lots in the plat have been sold, the plat, or any part of the plat, may be vacated on the application of all the owners of lots in the plat with approval obtained in the manner prescribed for the original plat.

(c) The county clerk shall write legibly on the vacated plat the word "Vacated" and shall enter on the plat a reference to the volume and page at which the vacating instrument is recorded.

(d) On the execution and recording of the vacating instrument, the vacated plat has no effect.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.014. REPLATTING WITHOUT VACATING PRECEDING PLAT. A replat of a subdivision or part of a subdivision may be recorded and is controlling over the preceding plat without vacation of that plat if the replat:

(1) is signed and acknowledged by only the owners of the property being replatted;

(2) is approved by the municipal authority responsible for approving plats; and

(3) does not attempt to amend or remove any covenants or restrictions.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1242 (H.B. 3314), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 212.0145. REPLATTING WITHOUT VACATING PRECEDING PLAT: CERTAIN SUBDIVISIONS. (a) A replat of a part of a subdivision may be recorded and is controlling over the preceding plat without vacation of that plat if the replat:

(1) is signed and acknowledged by only the owners of the property being replatted; and

(2) involves only property:

(A) of less than one acre that fronts an existing street; and

(B) that is owned and used by a nonprofit corporation established to assist children in at-risk situations through volunteer and individualized attention.

(b) An existing covenant or restriction for property that is replatted under this section does not have to be amended or removed if:

(1) the covenant or restriction was recorded more than 50 years before the date of the replat; and

(2) the replatted property has been continuously used by the nonprofit corporation for at least 10 years before the date of the replat.

(c) Sections 212.014 and 212.015 do not apply to a replat under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1130, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 212.0146. REPLATTING WITHOUT VACATING PRECEDING PLAT: CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) This section applies only to a replat of a subdivision or a part of a subdivision located in a municipality or the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality with a population of 1.4 million or more.

(b) A replat of a subdivision or part of a subdivision may be recorded and is controlling over the preceding plat without vacation of that plat if:

(1) the replat is signed and acknowledged by each owner and only the owners of the property being replatted;

(2) the municipal authority responsible for approving plats holds a public hearing on the matter at which parties in interest and citizens have an opportunity to be heard;

(3) the replat does not amend, remove, or violate, or have the effect of amending, removing, or violating, any covenants or restrictions that are contained or referenced in a dedicatory instrument recorded in the real property records separately from the preceding plat or replat;

(4) the replat does not attempt to amend, remove, or violate, or have the effect of amending, removing, or violating, any existing public utility easements without the consent of the affected utility companies; and

(5) the municipal authority responsible for approving plats approves the replat after determining that the replat complies with this subchapter and rules adopted under Section 212.002 and this section in effect at the time the application for the replat is filed.

(c) The governing body of a municipality may adopt rules governing replats, including rules that establish criteria under which covenants, restrictions, or plat notations that are contained only in the preceding plat or replat without reference in any dedicatory instrument recorded in the real property records separately from the preceding plat or replat may be amended or removed.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 654 (H.B. 1067), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 60 (H.B. 1553), Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 140, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.015. ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN REPLATS. (a) In addition to compliance with Section 212.014, a replat without vacation of the preceding plat must conform to the requirements of this section if:

(1) during the preceding five years, any of the area to be replatted was limited by an interim or permanent zoning classification to residential use for not more than two residential units per lot; or

(2) any lot in the preceding plat was limited by deed restrictions to residential use for not more than two residential units per lot.

(a-1) If a proposed replat described by Subsection (a) requires a variance or exception, a public hearing must be held by the municipal planning commission or the governing body of the municipality.

(b) Notice of the hearing required under Subsection (a-1) shall be given before the 15th day before the date of the hearing by:

(1) publication in an official newspaper or a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the municipality is located; and

(2) by written notice, with a copy of Subsection (c) attached, forwarded by the municipal authority responsible for approving plats to the owners of lots that are in the original subdivision and that are within 200 feet of the lots to be replatted, as indicated on the most recently approved municipal tax roll or in the case of a subdivision within the extraterritorial jurisdiction, the most recently approved county tax roll of the property upon which the replat is requested. The written notice may be delivered by depositing the notice, properly addressed with postage prepaid, in a post office or postal depository within the boundaries of the municipality.

(c) If the proposed replat requires a variance and is protested in accordance with this subsection, the proposed replat must receive, in order to be approved, the affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members present of the municipal planning commission or governing body, or both. For a legal protest, written instruments signed by the owners of at least 20 percent of the area of the lots or land immediately adjoining the area covered by the proposed replat and extending 200 feet from that area, but within the original subdivision, must be filed with the municipal planning commission or governing body, or both, prior to the close of the public hearing.

(d) In computing the percentage of land area under Subsection (c), the area of streets and alleys shall be included.

(e) Compliance with Subsections (c) and (d) is not required for approval of a replat of part of a preceding plat if the area to be replatted was designated or reserved for other than single or duplex family residential use by notation on the last legally recorded plat or in the legally recorded restrictions applicable to the plat.

(f) If a proposed replat described by Subsection (a) does not require a variance or exception, the municipality shall, not later than the 15th day after the date the replat is approved, provide written notice by mail of the approval of the replat to each owner of a lot in the original subdivision that is within 200 feet of the lots to be replatted according to the most recent municipality or county tax roll. This subsection does not apply to a proposed replat if the municipal planning commission or the governing body of the municipality holds a public hearing and gives notice of the hearing in the manner provided by Subsection (b).

(g) The notice of a replat approval required by Subsection (f) must include:

(1) the zoning designation of the property after the replat; and

(2) a telephone number and e-mail address an owner of a lot may use to contact the municipality about the replat.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 345, Sec. 2 to 5, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1046, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 951 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1242 (H.B. 3314), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 212.0155. ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN REPLATS AFFECTING A SUBDIVISION GOLF COURSE. (a) This section applies to land located wholly or partly:

(1) in the corporate boundaries of a municipality if the municipality:

(A) has a population of more than 50,000; and

(B) is located wholly or partly in:

(i) a county with a population of more than three million;

(ii) a county with a population of more than 400,000 that is adjacent to a county with a population of more than three million; or

(iii) a county with a population of more than 1.4 million:

(a) in which two or more municipalities with a population of 300,000 or more are primarily located; and

(b) that is adjacent to a county with a population of more than two million; or

(2) in the corporate boundaries or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality with a population of 1.9 million or more.

(b) In this section:

(1) "Management certificate" means a certificate described by Section 209.004, Property Code.

(2) "New plat" means a development plat, replat, amending plat, or vacating plat that would change the existing plat or the current use of the land that is the subject of the new plat.

(3) "Property owners' association" and "restrictive covenant" have the meanings assigned by Section 202.001, Property Code.

(4) "Restrictions," "subdivision," and "owner" have the meanings assigned by Section 201.003, Property Code.

(5) "Subdivision golf course" means an area of land:

(A) that was originally developed as a golf course or a country club within a common scheme of development for a predominantly residential single-family development project;

(B) that was at any time in the seven years preceding the date on which a new plat for the land is filed:

(i) used as a golf course or a country club;

(ii) zoned as a community facility;

(iii) benefited from restrictive covenants on adjoining homeowners; or

(iv) designated on a recorded plat as a golf course or a country club; and

(C) that is not separated entirely from the predominantly residential single-family development project by a public street.

(c) In addition to any other requirement of this chapter, a new plat must conform to the requirements of this section if any of the area subject to the new plat is a subdivision golf course. The exception in Section 212.004(a) excluding divisions of land into parts greater than five acres for platting requirements does not apply to a subdivision golf course.

(d) A new plat that is subject to this section may not be approved until each municipal authority reviewing the new plat conducts a public hearing on the matter at which the parties in interest and citizens have an adequate opportunity to be heard, present evidence, and submit statements or petitions for consideration by the municipal authority. The number, location, and procedure for the public hearings may be designated by the municipal authority for a particular hearing. The municipal authority may abate, continue, or reschedule, as the municipal authority considers appropriate, any public hearing in order to receive a full and complete record on which to make a decision. If the new plat would otherwise be administratively approved, the municipal planning commission is the approving body for the purposes of this section.

(e) The municipal authority may not approve the new plat without adequate consideration of testimony and the record from the public hearings and making the findings required by Subsection (k). Not later than the 30th day after the date on which all proceedings necessary for the public hearings have concluded, the municipal authority shall take action on the application for the new plat. Sections 212.009(a) and (b) do not apply to the approval of plats under this section.

(f) The municipality may provide notice of the initial hearing required by Subsection (d) only after the requirements of Subsections (m) and (n) are met. The notice shall be given before the 15th day before the date of the hearing by:

(1) publishing notice in an official newspaper or a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the municipality is located;

(2) providing written notice, with a copy of this section attached, by the municipal authority responsible for approving plats to:

(A) each property owners' association for each neighborhood benefited by the subdivision golf course, as indicated in the most recently filed management certificates; and

(B) the owners of lots that are within 200 feet of the area subject to the new plat, as indicated:

(i) on the most recently approved municipal tax roll; and

(ii) in the most recent online records of the central appraisal district of the county in which the lots are located; and

(3) any other manner determined by the municipal authority to be necessary to ensure that full and fair notice is provided to all owners of residential single-family lots in the general vicinity of the subdivision golf course.

(g) The written notice required by Subsection (f)(2) may be delivered by depositing the notice, properly addressed with postage prepaid, in the United States mail.

(h) The cost of providing the notices under Subsection (f) shall be paid by the plat applicant.

(i) If written instruments protesting the proposed new plat are signed by the owners of at least 20 percent of the area of the lots or land immediately adjacent to the area covered by a proposed new plat and extending 200 feet from that area and are filed with the municipal planning commission or the municipality's governing body before the conclusion of the public hearings, the proposed new plat must receive, to be approved, the affirmative vote of at least three-fifths of the members of the municipal planning commission or governing body.

(j) In computing the percentage of land area under Subsection (i), the area of streets and alleys is included.

(k) The municipal planning commission or the municipality's governing body may not approve a new plat under this section unless it determines that:

(1) there is adequate existing or planned infrastructure to support the future development of the subdivision golf course;

(2) based on existing or planned facilities, the development of the subdivision golf course will not have a materially adverse effect on:

(A) traffic, parking, drainage, water, sewer, or other utilities;

(B) the health, safety, or general welfare of persons in the municipality; or

(C) safe, orderly, and healthful development of the municipality;

(3) the development of the subdivision golf course will not have a materially adverse effect on existing single-family property values;

(4) the new plat is consistent with all applicable land use regulations and restrictive covenants and the municipality's land use policies as described by the municipality's comprehensive plan or other appropriate public policy documents; and

(5) if any portion of a previous plat reflected a restriction on the subdivision golf course whether:

(A) that restriction is an implied covenant or easement benefiting adjacent residential properties; or

(B) the restriction, covenant, or easement has been legally released or has expired.

(l) The municipal authority may adopt rules to govern the platting of a subdivision golf course that do not conflict with this section, including rules that require more detailed information than is required by Subsection (n) for plans for development and new plat applications.

(m) The application for a new plat under this section is not complete and may not be submitted for review for administrative completeness unless the tax certificates required by Section 12.002(e), Property Code, are attached, notwithstanding that the application is for a type of plat other than a plat specified in that section.

(n) A plan for development or a new plat application for a subdivision golf course is not considered to provide fair notice of the project and nature of the permit sought unless it contains the following information, complete in all material respects:

(1) street layout;

(2) lot and block layout;

(3) number of residential units;

(4) location of nonresidential development, by type of development;

(5) drainage, detention, and retention plans;

(6) screening plan for adjacent residential properties, including landscaping or fencing; and

(7) an analysis of the effect of the project on values in the adjacent residential neighborhoods.

(o) A municipal authority with authority over platting may require as a condition for approval of a plat for a golf course that:

(1) the area be platted as a restricted reserve for the proposed use; and

(2) the plat be incorporated into the plat for any adjacent residential lots.

(p) An owner of a lot that is within 200 feet of a subdivision golf course may seek declaratory or injunctive relief from a district court to enforce the provisions in this section.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1092 (H.B. 3232), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (H.B. 1473), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 675 (S.B. 1789), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 78, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 212.016. AMENDING PLAT. (a) The municipal authority responsible for approving plats may approve and issue an amending plat, which may be recorded and is controlling over the preceding plat without vacation of that plat, if the amending plat is signed by the applicants only and is solely for one or more of the following purposes:

(1) to correct an error in a course or distance shown on the preceding plat;

(2) to add a course or distance that was omitted on the preceding plat;

(3) to correct an error in a real property description shown on the preceding plat;

(4) to indicate monuments set after the death, disability, or retirement from practice of the engineer or surveyor responsible for setting monuments;

(5) to show the location or character of a monument that has been changed in location or character or that is shown incorrectly as to location or character on the preceding plat;

(6) to correct any other type of scrivener or clerical error or omission previously approved by the municipal authority responsible for approving plats, including lot numbers, acreage, street names, and identification of adjacent recorded plats;

(7) to correct an error in courses and distances of lot lines between two adjacent lots if:

(A) both lot owners join in the application for amending the plat;

(B) neither lot is abolished;

(C) the amendment does not attempt to remove recorded covenants or restrictions; and

(D) the amendment does not have a material adverse effect on the property rights of the other owners in the plat;

(8) to relocate a lot line to eliminate an inadvertent encroachment of a building or other improvement on a lot line or easement;

(9) to relocate one or more lot lines between one or more adjacent lots if:

(A) the owners of all those lots join in the application for amending the plat;

(B) the amendment does not attempt to remove recorded covenants or restrictions; and

(C) the amendment does not increase the number of lots;

(10) to make necessary changes to the preceding plat to create six or fewer lots in the subdivision or a part of the subdivision covered by the preceding plat if:

(A) the changes do not affect applicable zoning and other regulations of the municipality;

(B) the changes do not attempt to amend or remove any covenants or restrictions; and

(C) the area covered by the changes is located in an area that the municipal planning commission or other appropriate governing body of the municipality has approved, after a public hearing, as a residential improvement area; or

(11) to replat one or more lots fronting on an existing street if:

(A) the owners of all those lots join in the application for amending the plat;

(B) the amendment does not attempt to remove recorded covenants or restrictions;

(C) the amendment does not increase the number of lots; and

(D) the amendment does not create or require the creation of a new street or make necessary the extension of municipal facilities.

(b) Notice, a hearing, and the approval of other lot owners are not required for the approval and issuance of an amending plat.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 92, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 212.017. CONFLICT OF INTEREST; PENALTY. (a) In this section, "subdivided tract" means a tract of land, as a whole, that is subdivided. The term does not mean an individual lot in a subdivided tract of land.

(b) A person has a substantial interest in a subdivided tract if the person:

(1) has an equitable or legal ownership interest in the tract with a fair market value of $2,500 or more;

(2) acts as a developer of the tract;

(3) owns 10 percent or more of the voting stock or shares of or owns either 10 percent or more or $5,000 or more of the fair market value of a business entity that:

(A) has an equitable or legal ownership interest in the tract with a fair market value of $2,500 or more; or

(B) acts as a developer of the tract; or

(4) receives in a calendar year funds from a business entity described by Subdivision (3) that exceed 10 percent of the person's gross income for the previous year.

(c) A person also is considered to have a substantial interest in a subdivided tract if the person is related in the first degree by consanguinity or affinity, as determined under Chapter 573, Government Code, to another person who, under Subsection (b), has a substantial interest in the tract.

(d) If a member of the municipal authority responsible for approving plats has a substantial interest in a subdivided tract, the member shall file, before a vote or decision regarding the approval of a plat for the tract, an affidavit stating the nature and extent of the interest and shall abstain from further participation in the matter. The affidavit must be filed with the municipal secretary or clerk.

(e) A member of the municipal authority responsible for approving plats commits an offense if the member violates Subsection (d). An offense under this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.

(f) The finding by a court of a violation of this section does not render voidable an action of the municipal authority responsible for approving plats unless the measure would not have passed the municipal authority without the vote of the member who violated this section.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 38, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 212.0175. ENFORCEMENT IN CERTAIN COUNTIES; PENALTY. (a) The attorney general may take any action necessary to enforce a requirement imposed by or under Section 212.0105 or 212.0106 or to ensure that water and sewer service facilities are constructed or installed to service a subdivision in compliance with the model rules adopted under Section 16.343, Water Code.

(b) A person who violates Section 212.0105 or 212.0106 or fails to timely provide for the construction or installation of water or sewer service facilities that the person described on the plat or on the document attached to the plat, as required by Section 212.0105, is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $500 nor more than $1,000 plus court costs and attorney's fees.

(c) An owner of a tract of land commits an offense if the owner knowingly or intentionally violates a requirement imposed by or under Section 212.0105 or 212.0106 or fails to timely provide for the construction or installation of water or sewer service facilities that the person described on a plat or on a document attached to a plat, as required by Section 212.0105. An offense under this subsection is a Class B misdemeanor.

(d) A reference in this section to an "owner of a tract of land" does not include the owner of an individual lot in a subdivided tract of land.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 212.018. ENFORCEMENT IN GENERAL. (a) At the request of the governing body of the municipality, the municipal attorney or any other attorney representing the municipality may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to:

(1) enjoin the violation or threatened violation by the owner of a tract of land of a requirement regarding the tract and established by, or adopted by the governing body under, this subchapter; or

(2) recover damages from the owner of a tract of land in an amount adequate for the municipality to undertake any construction or other activity necessary to bring about compliance with a requirement regarding the tract and established by, or adopted by the governing body under, this subchapter.

(b) A reference in this section to an "owner of a tract of land" does not include the owner of an individual lot in a subdivided tract of land.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 46(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 624, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. REGULATION OF PROPERTY DEVELOPMENT

Sec. 212.041. MUNICIPALITY COVERED BY SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a municipality whose governing body chooses by ordinance to be covered by this subchapter or chose by ordinance to be covered by the law codified by this subchapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 125, Sec. 1, eff. May 11, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1046, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 212.042. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER A. The provisions of Subchapter A that do not conflict with this subchapter apply to development plats.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.043. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Development" means the new construction or the enlargement of any exterior dimension of any building, structure, or improvement.

(2) "Extraterritorial jurisdiction" means a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction as determined under Chapter 42.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.044. PLANS, RULES, AND ORDINANCES. After a public hearing on the matter, the municipality may adopt general plans, rules, or ordinances governing development plats of land within the limits and in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality to promote the health, safety, morals, or general welfare of the municipality and the safe, orderly, and healthful development of the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.045. DEVELOPMENT PLAT REQUIRED. (a) Any person who proposes the development of a tract of land located within the limits or in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality must have a development plat of the tract prepared in accordance with this subchapter and the applicable plans, rules, or ordinances of the municipality.

(b) A development plat must be prepared by a registered professional land surveyor as a boundary survey showing:

(1) each existing or proposed building, structure, or improvement or proposed modification of the external configuration of the building, structure, or improvement involving a change of the building, structure, or improvement;

(2) each easement and right-of-way within or abutting the boundary of the surveyed property; and

(3) the dimensions of each street, sidewalk, alley, square, park, or other part of the property intended to be dedicated to public use or for the use of purchasers or owners of lots fronting on or adjacent to the street, sidewalk, alley, square, park, or other part.

(c) New development may not begin on the property until the development plat is filed with and approved by the municipality in accordance with Section 212.047.

(d) If a person is required under Subchapter A or an ordinance of the municipality to file a subdivision plat, a development plat is not required in addition to the subdivision plat.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1091, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 212.046. RESTRICTION ON ISSUANCE OF BUILDING AND OTHER PERMITS BY MUNICIPALITY, COUNTY, OR OFFICIAL OF OTHER GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY. The municipality, a county, or an official of another governmental entity may not issue a building permit or any other type of permit for development on lots or tracts subject to this subchapter until a development plat is filed with and approved by the municipality in accordance with Section 212.047.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.047. APPROVAL OF DEVELOPMENT PLAT. The municipality shall endorse approval on a development plat filed with it if the plat conforms to:

(1) the general plans, rules, and ordinances of the municipality concerning its current and future streets, sidewalks, alleys, parks, playgrounds, and public utility facilities;

(2) the general plans, rules, and ordinances for the extension of the municipality or the extension, improvement, or widening of its roads, streets, and public highways within the municipality and in its extraterritorial jurisdiction, taking into account access to and extension of sewer and water mains and the instrumentalities of public utilities; and

(3) any general plans, rules, or ordinances adopted under Section 212.044.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.048. EFFECT OF APPROVAL ON DEDICATION. The approval of a development plat is not considered an acceptance of any proposed dedication for public use or use by persons other than the owner of the property covered by the plat and does not impose on the municipality any duty regarding the maintenance or improvement of any purportedly dedicated parts until the municipality's governing body makes an actual appropriation of the dedicated parts by formal acceptance, entry, use, or improvement.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.049. BUILDING PERMITS IN EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION. This subchapter does not authorize the municipality to require municipal building permits or otherwise enforce the municipality's building code in its extraterritorial jurisdiction.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 212.050. ENFORCEMENT; PENALTY. (a) If it appears that a violation or threat of a violation of this subchapter or a plan, rule, or ordinance adopted under this subchapter or consistent with this subchapter exists, the municipality is entitled to appropriate injunctive relief against the person who committed, is committing, or is threatening to commit the violation.

(b) A suit for injunctive relief may be brought in the county in which the defendant resides, the county in which the violation or threat of violation occurs, or any county in which the municipality is wholly or partly located.

(c) In a suit to enjoin a violation or threat of a violation of this subchapter or a plan, rule, ordinance, or other order adopted under this subchapter, the court may grant the municipality any prohibitory or mandatory injunction warranted by the facts including a temporary restraining order, temporary injunction, or permanent injunction.

(d) A person commits an offense if the person violates this subchapter or a plan, rule, or ordinance adopted under this subchapter or consistent with this subchapter within the limits of the municipality. An offense under this subsection is a Class C misdemeanor. Each day the violation continues constitutes a separate offense.

(e) A suit under this section shall be given precedence over all other cases of a different nature on the docket of the trial or appellate court.

(f) It is no defense to a criminal or civil suit under this section that an agency of government other than the municipality issued a license or permit authorizing the construction, repair, or alteration of any building, structure, or improvement. It also is no defense that the defendant had no knowledge of this subchapter or of an applicable plan, rule, or ordinance.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER C. DEVELOPER PARTICIPATION IN CONTRACT FOR PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS

Sec. 212.071. DEVELOPER PARTICIPATION CONTRACT. Without complying with the competitive sealed bidding procedure of Chapter 252, a municipality with 5,000 or more inhabitants may make a contract with a developer of a subdivision or land in the municipality to construct public improvements, not including a building, related to the development. If the contract does not meet the requirements of this subchapter, Chapter 252 applies to the contract if the contract would otherwise be governed by that chapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 47(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1547, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 212.072. DUTIES OF PARTIES UNDER CONTRACT. (a) Under the contract, the developer shall construct the improvements and the municipality shall participate in their cost.

(b) The contract:

(1) must establish the limit of participation by the municipality at a level not to exceed 30 percent of the total contract price, if the municipality has a population of less than 1.8 million; or

(2) may allow participation by a municipality at a level not to exceed 70 percent of the total contract price, if the municipality has a population of 1.8 million or more.

(b-1) In addition, if the municipality has a population of 1.8 million or more, the municipality may participate at a level not to exceed 100 percent of the total contract price for all required drainage improvements related to the development and construction of affordable housing. Under this subsection, affordable housing is defined as housing which is equal to or less than the median sales price, as determined by the Real Estate Center at Texas A&M University, of a home in the Metropolitan Statistical Area (MSA) in which the municipality is located.

(c) In addition, the contract may also allow participation by the municipality at a level not to exceed 100 percent of the total cost for any oversizing of improvements required by the municipality, including but not limited to increased capacity of improvements to anticipate other future development in the area.

(d) The municipality is liable only for the agreed payment of its share of the contract, which shall be determined in advance either as a lump sum or as a factor or percentage of the total actual cost as determined by municipal ordinance.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 47(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1526, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1075 (H.B. 1606), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 212.073. PERFORMANCE BOND. The developer must execute a performance bond for the construction of the improvements to ensure completion of the project. The bond must be executed by a corporate surety in accordance with Chapter 2253, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 47(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 212.074. ADDITIONAL SAFEGUARDS; INSPECTION OF RECORDS. (a) In the ordinance adopted by the municipality under Section 212.072(b), the municipality may include additional safeguards against undue loading of cost, collusion, or fraud.

(b) All of the developer's books and other records related to the project shall be available for inspection by the municipality.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 47(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER D. REGULATION OF PROPERTY DEVELOPMENT PROHIBITED IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES

Sec. 212.101. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER TO CERTAIN HOME-RULE MUNICIPALITY. This subchapter applies only to a home-rule municipality that:

(1) has a charter provision allowing for limited-purpose annexation; and

(2) has annexed territory for a limited purpose.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 23.02(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 212.102. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Affected area" means an area that is:

(A) in a municipality or a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction;

(B) in a county other than the county in which a majority of the territory of the municipality is located;

(C) within the boundaries of one or more school districts other than the school district in which a majority of the territory of the municipality is located; and

(D) within the area of or within 1,500 feet of the boundary of an assessment road district in which there are two state highways.

(2) "Assessment road district" means a road district that has issued refunding bonds and that has imposed assessments on each parcel of land under Subchapter C, Chapter 1471, Government Code.

(3) "State highway" means a highway that is part of the state highway system under Section 221.001, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 23.02(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.289, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 212.103. TRAFFIC OR TRAFFIC OPERATIONS. (a) A municipality may not deny, limit, delay, or condition the use or development of land, any part of which is within an affected area, because of:

(1) traffic or traffic operations that would result from the proposed use or development of the land; or

(2) the effect that the proposed use or development of the land would have on traffic or traffic operations.

(b) In this section, an action to deny, limit, delay, or condition the use or development of land includes a decision or other action by the governing body of the municipality or by a commission, board, department, agency, office, or employee of the municipality related to zoning, subdivision, site planning, the construction or building permit process, or any other municipal process, approval, or permit.

(c) This subchapter does not prevent a municipality from exercising its authority to require the dedication of right-of-way.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 23.02(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 212.104. PROVISION NOT ENFORCEABLE. A provision in a covenant or agreement relating to land in an affected area that would have the effect of denying, limiting, delaying, or conditioning the use or development of the land because of its effect on traffic or traffic operations may not be enforced by a municipality.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 23.02(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 212.105. SUBCHAPTER CONTROLS. This subchapter controls over any other law relating to municipal regulation of land use or development based on traffic.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 23.02(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER E. MORATORIUM ON PROPERTY DEVELOPMENT IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES

Sec. 212.131. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Essential public facilities" means water, sewer, or storm drainage facilities or street improvements provided by a municipality or private utility.

(2) "Residential property" means property zoned for or otherwise authorized for single-family or multi-family use.

(3) "Property development" means the construction, reconstruction, or other alteration or improvement of residential or commercial buildings or the subdivision or replatting of a subdivision of residential or commercial property.

(4) "Commercial property" means property zoned for or otherwise authorized for use other than single-family use, multifamily use, heavy industrial use, or use as a quarry.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 441, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.132. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies only to a moratorium imposed on property development affecting only residential property, commercial property, or both residential and commercial property.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 441, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.133. PROCEDURE FOR ADOPTING MORATORIUM. A municipality may not adopt a moratorium on property development unless the municipality:

(1) complies with the notice and hearing procedures prescribed by Section 212.134; and

(2) makes written findings as provided by Section 212.135, 212.1351, or 212.1352, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 441, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.134. NOTICE AND PUBLIC HEARING REQUIREMENTS. (a) Before a moratorium on property development may be imposed, a municipality must conduct public hearings as provided by this section.

(b) A public hearing must provide municipal residents and affected parties an opportunity to be heard. The municipality must publish notice of the time and place of a hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality on the fourth day before the date of the hearing.

(c) Beginning on the fifth business day after the date a notice is published under Subsection (b), a temporary moratorium takes effect. During the period of the temporary moratorium, a municipality may stop accepting permits, authorizations, and approvals necessary for the subdivision of, site planning of, or construction on real property.

(d) One public hearing must be held before the governing body of the municipality. Another public hearing must be held before the municipal zoning commission, if the municipality has a zoning commission.

(e) If a general-law municipality does not have a zoning commission, two public hearings separated by at least four days must be held before the governing body of the municipality.

(f) Within 12 days after the date of the first public hearing, the municipality shall make a final determination on the imposition of a moratorium. Before an ordinance adopting a moratorium may be imposed, the ordinance must be given at least two readings by the governing body of the municipality. The readings must be separated by at least four days. If the municipality fails to adopt an ordinance imposing a moratorium within the period prescribed by this subsection, an ordinance imposing a moratorium may not be adopted, and the temporary moratorium imposed under Subsection (c) expires.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 441, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 212.135. JUSTIFICATION FOR MORATORIUM: SHORTAGE OF ESSENTIAL PUBLIC FACILITIES; WRITTEN FINDINGS REQUIRED. (a) If a municipality adopts a moratorium on property development, the moratorium is justified by demonstrating a need to prevent a shortage of essential public facilities. The municipality must issue written findings based on reasonably available information.

(b) The written findings must include a summary of:

(1) evidence demonstrating the extent of need beyond the estimated capacity of existing essential public facilities that is expected to result from new property development, including identifying:

(A) any essential public facilities currently operating near, at, or beyond capacity;

(B) the portion of that capacity committed to the development subject to the moratorium; and

(C) the impact fee revenue allocated to address the facility need; and

(2) evidence demonstrating that the moratorium is reasonably limited to:

(A) areas of the municipality where a shortage of essential public facilities would otherwise occur; and

(B) property that has not been approved for development because of the insufficiency of existing essential public facilities.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 441, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.1351. JUSTIFICATION FOR MORATORIUM: SIGNIFICANT NEED FOR PUBLIC FACILITIES; WRITTEN FINDINGS REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Section 212.1352, a moratorium that is not based on a shortage of essential public facilities is justified only by demonstrating a significant need for other public facilities, including police and fire facilities. For purposes of this subsection, a significant need for public facilities is established if the failure to provide those public facilities would result in an overcapacity of public facilities or would be detrimental to the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of the municipality. The municipality must issue written findings based on reasonably available information.

(b) The written findings must include a summary of:

(1) evidence demonstrating that applying existing development ordinances or regulations and other applicable laws is inadequate to prevent the new development from causing the overcapacity of municipal infrastructure or being detrimental to the public health, safety, and welfare in an affected geographical area;

(2) evidence demonstrating that alternative methods of achieving the objectives of the moratorium are unsatisfactory; and

(3) evidence demonstrating that the municipality has approved a working plan and time schedule for achieving the objectives of the moratorium.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.1352. JUSTIFICATION FOR COMMERCIAL MORATORIUM IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES; WRITTEN FINDINGS REQUIRED. (a) If a municipality adopts a moratorium on commercial property development that is not based on a demonstrated shortage of essential public facilities, the municipality must issue written findings based on reasonably available information that the moratorium is justified by demonstrating that applying existing commercial development ordinances or regulations and other applicable laws is inadequate to prevent the new development from being detrimental to the public health, safety, or welfare of the residents of the municipality.

(b) The written findings must include a summary of:

(1) evidence demonstrating the need to adopt new ordinances or regulations or to amend existing ordinances, including identification of the harm to the public health, safety, or welfare that will occur if a moratorium is not adopted;

(2) the geographical boundaries in which the moratorium will apply;

(3) the specific types of commercial property to which the moratorium will apply; and

(4) the objectives or goals to be achieved by adopting new ordinances or regulations or amending existing ordinances or regulations during the period the moratorium is in effect.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.136. EXPIRATION OF MORATORIUM; EXTENSION. A moratorium adopted under Section 212.135 or 212.1351 expires on the 120th day after the date the moratorium is adopted unless the municipality extends the moratorium by:

(1) holding a public hearing on the proposed extension of the moratorium; and

(2) adopting written findings that:

(A) identify the problem requiring the need for extending the moratorium;

(B) describe the reasonable progress made to alleviate the problem; and

(C) specify a definite duration for the renewal period of the moratorium.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 441, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.1361. NOTICE FOR EXTENSION REQUIRED. A municipality proposing an extension of a moratorium under this subchapter must publish notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality not later than the 15th day before the date of the hearing required by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.1362. EXPIRATION OF MORATORIUM ON COMMERCIAL PROPERTY IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES; EXTENSION. (a) A moratorium on commercial property adopted under Section 212.1352 expires on the 90th day after the date the moratorium is adopted unless the municipality extends the moratorium by:

(1) holding a public hearing on the proposed extension of the moratorium; and

(2) adopting written findings that:

(A) identify the problem requiring the need for extending the moratorium;

(B) describe the reasonable progress made to alleviate the problem;

(C) specify a definite duration for the renewal period of the moratorium; and

(D) include a summary of evidence demonstrating that the problem will be resolved within the extended duration of the moratorium.

(b) A municipality may not adopt a moratorium on commercial property under Section 212.1352 that exceeds an aggregate of 180 days. A municipality may not adopt a moratorium on commercial property under Section 212.1352 before the second anniversary of the expiration date of a previous moratorium if the subsequent moratorium addresses the same harm, affects the same type of commercial property, or affects the same geographical area identified by the previous moratorium.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.137. WAIVER PROCEDURES REQUIRED. (a) A moratorium adopted under this subchapter must allow a permit applicant to apply for a waiver from the moratorium relating to the property subject to the permit by:

(1) claiming a right obtained under a development agreement; or

(2) providing the public facilities that are the subject of the moratorium at the landowner's cost.

(b) The permit applicant must submit the reasons for the request to the governing body of the municipality in writing. The governing body of the municipality must vote on whether to grant the waiver request within 10 days after the date of receiving the written request.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 441, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 212.138. EFFECT ON OTHER LAW. A moratorium adopted under this subchapter does not affect the rights acquired under Chapter 245 or common law.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 441, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 212.139. LIMITATION ON MORATORIUM. (a) A moratorium adopted under this subchapter does not affect an application for a project in progress under Chapter 245.

(b) A municipality may not adopt a moratorium under this subchapter that:

(1) prohibits a person from filing or processing an application for a project in progress under Chapter 245; or

(2) prohibits or delays the processing of an application for zoning filed before the effective date of the moratorium.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1321 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER F. ENFORCEMENT OF LAND USE RESTRICTIONS CONTAINED IN PLATS AND OTHER INSTRUMENTS

Sec. 212.151. MUNICIPALITY COVERED BY SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a municipality:

(1) with a population of 1.5 million or more that passes an ordinance that requires uniform application and enforcement of this subchapter with regard to all property and residents;

(2) with a population of less than 4,500 that:

(A) is located in two counties, one of which has a population greater than 45,000; and

(B) borders Lake Lyndon B. Johnson; or

(3) that does not have zoning ordinances and passes an ordinance that requires uniform application and enforcement of this subchapter with regard to all property and residents.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 893, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 230.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 12.002(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 212.131 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(107), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 475 (S.B. 1090), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 141, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 212.152. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "restriction" means a land-use regulation that:

(1) affects the character of the use to which real property, including residential and rental property, may be put;

(2) fixes the distance that a structure must be set back from property lines, street lines, or lot lines;

(3) affects the size of a lot or the size, type, and number of structures that may be built on the lot;

(4) regulates or restricts the type of activities that may take place on the property, including commercial activities, sweepstakes activities, keeping of animals, use of fire, nuisance activities, vehicle storage, and parking;

(5) regulates architectural features of a structure, construction of fences, landscaping, garbage disposal, or noise levels; or

(6) specifies the type of maintenance that must be performed on a lot or structure, including maintenance of a yard or fence.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Local Government Code, Sec. 230.002 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 12.002(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1044, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003. Renumbered from Local Government Code, Sec. 212.132 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(107), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 212.153. SUIT TO ENFORCE RESTRICTIONS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the municipality may sue in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin or abate a violation of a restriction contained or incorporated by reference in a properly recorded plan, plat, or other instrument that affects a subdivision located inside the boundaries of the municipality.

(b) The municipality may not initiate or maintain a suit to enjoin or abate a violation of a restriction if a property owners' association with the authority to enforce the restriction files suit to enforce the restriction.

(c) In a suit by a property owners' association to enforce a restriction, the association may not submit into evidence or otherwise use the work product of the municipality's legal counsel.

(d) In a suit filed under this section alleging that any of the following activities violates a restriction limiting property to residential use, it is not a defense that the activity is incidental to the residential use of the property:

(1) storing a tow truck, crane, moving van or truck, dump truck, cement mixer, earth-moving device, or trailer longer than 20 feet; or

(2) repairing or offering for sale more than two motor vehicles in a 12-month period.

(e) A municipality may not enforce a deed restriction which purports to regulate or restrict the rights granted to public utilities to install, operate, maintain, replace, and remove facilities within easements and private or public rights-of-way.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Local Government Code, Sec. 230.003 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 12.002, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1044, Sec. 2, eff. Sept 1, 2003. Renumbered from Local Government Code, Sec. 212.133 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(107), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 212.1535. FORECLOSURE BY PROPERTY OWNERS' ASSOCIATION. (a) A municipality may not participate in a suit or other proceeding to foreclose a property owners' association's lien on real property.

(b) In a suit or other proceeding to foreclose a property owners' association's lien on real property in the subdivision, the association may not submit into evidence or otherwise use the work product of the municipality's legal counsel.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1044, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 212.1335 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(53), eff. September 1, 2007

Sec. 212.154. LIMITATION ON ENFORCEMENT. A restriction contained in a plan, plat, or other instrument that was properly recorded before August 30, 1965, may be enforced as provided by Section 212.153, but a violation of a restriction that occurred before that date may not be enjoined or abated by the municipality as long as the nature of the violation remains unchanged.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 230.004 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 12.002(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 212.134 and amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(107), 3(33), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 212.155. NOTICE TO PURCHASERS. (a) The governing body of the municipality may require, in the manner prescribed by law for official action of the municipality, any person who sells or conveys restricted property located inside the boundaries of the municipality to first give to the purchaser written notice of the restrictions and notice of the municipality's right to enforce compliance.

(b) If the municipality elects under this section to require that notice be given, the notice to the purchaser shall contain the following information:

(1) the name of each purchaser;

(2) the name of each seller;

(3) a legal description of the property;

(4) the street address of the property;

(5) a statement that the property is subject to deed restrictions and the municipality is authorized to enforce the restrictions;

(6) a reference to the volume and page, clerk's file number, or film code number where the restrictions are recorded; and

(7) a statement that provisions that restrict the sale, rental, or use of the real property on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin are unenforceable.

(c) If the municipality elects under this section to require that notice be given, the following procedure shall be followed to ensure the delivery and recordation of the notice:

(1) the notice shall be given to the purchaser at or before the final closing of the sale and purchase;

(2) the seller and purchaser shall sign and acknowledge the notice; and

(3) following the execution, acknowledgment, and closing of the sale and purchase, the notice shall be recorded in the real property records of the county in which the property is located.

(d) If the municipality elects under this section to require that notice be given:

(1) the municipality shall file in the real property records of the county clerk's office in each county in which the municipality is located a copy of the form of notice, with its effective date, that is prescribed for use by any person who sells or conveys restricted property located inside the boundaries of the municipality;

(2) all sellers and all persons completing the prescribed notice on the seller's behalf are entitled to rely on the currently effective form filed by the municipality;

(3) the municipality may prescribe a penalty against a seller, not to exceed $500, for the failure of the seller to obtain the execution and recordation of the notice; and

(4) an action may not be maintained by the municipality against a seller to collect a penalty for the failure to obtain the execution and recordation of the notice if the municipality has not filed for record the form of notice with the county clerk of the appropriate county.

(e) This section does not limit the seller's right to recover a penalty, or any part of a penalty, imposed pursuant to Subsection (d)(3) from a third party for the negligent failure to obtain the execution or proper recordation of the notice.

(f) The failure of the seller to comply with the requirements of this section and the implementing municipal regulation does not affect the validity or enforceability of the sale or conveyance of restricted property or the validity or enforceability of restrictions covering the property.

(g) For the purposes of this section, an executory contract of purchase and sale having a performance period of more than six months is considered a sale under Subsection (a).

(h) For the purposes of the disclosure required by this section, restrictions may not include provisions that restrict the sale, rental, or use of property on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin and may not include any restrictions that by their express provisions have terminated.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 446, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 230.005 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 12.002(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 212.135 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(107), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 212.156. ENFORCEMENT BY ORDINANCE; CIVIL PENALTY. (a) The governing body of the municipality by ordinance may require compliance with a restriction contained or incorporated by reference in a properly recorded plan, plat, or other instrument that affects a subdivision located inside the boundaries of the municipality.

(b) The municipality may bring a civil action to recover a civil penalty for a violation of the restriction. The municipality may bring an action and recover the penalty in the same manner as a municipality may bring an action and recover a penalty under Subchapter B, Chapter 54.

(c) For the purposes of an ordinance adopted under this section, restrictions do not include provisions that restrict the sale, rental, or use of property on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin and do not include any restrictions that by their express provisions have terminated.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 893, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 230.006 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 12.002(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 212.136 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(107), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 212.157. GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION. An action filed by a municipality under this subchapter to enforce a land use restriction is a governmental function of the municipality.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1399, Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2001.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 230.007 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(56), eff. September 1, 2007

Sec. 212.158. EFFECT ON OTHER LAW. This subchapter does not prohibit the exhibition, play, or necessary incidental action thereto of a sweepstakes not prohibited by Chapter 622, Business & Commerce Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1044, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.25, eff. April 1, 2009.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 212.138 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(54), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER G. AGREEMENT GOVERNING CERTAIN LAND IN A MUNICIPALITY'S EXTRATERRITORIAL JURISDICTION

Sec. 212.171. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter does not apply to land located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality with a population of 1.9 million or more.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 522, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 212.172. DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT. (a) In this subchapter:

(1) "Adjudication" of a claim means the bringing of a civil suit and prosecution to final judgment in county or state court and includes the bringing of an authorized arbitration proceeding and prosecution to final resolution in accordance with any mandatory procedures established in the contract agreement for the arbitration proceedings.

(2) "Contract" means a contract for a development agreement authorized by this subchapter.

(3) "Extraterritorial jurisdiction" means a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction as determined under Chapter 42.

(b) The governing body of a municipality may make a written contract with an owner of land that is located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality to:

(1) guarantee the continuation of the extraterritorial status of the land and its immunity from annexation by the municipality;

(2) extend the municipality's planning authority over the land by providing for a development plan to be prepared by the landowner and approved by the municipality under which certain general uses and development of the land are authorized;

(3) authorize enforcement by the municipality of certain municipal land use and development regulations in the same manner the regulations are enforced within the municipality's boundaries;

(4) authorize enforcement by the municipality of land use and development regulations other than those that apply within the municipality's boundaries, as may be agreed to by the landowner and the municipality;

(5) provide for infrastructure for the land, including:

(A) streets and roads;

(B) street and road drainage;

(C) land drainage; and

(D) water, wastewater, and other utility systems;

(6) authorize enforcement of environmental regulations;

(7) provide for the annexation of the land as a whole or in parts and to provide for the terms of annexation, if annexation is agreed to by the parties;

(8) specify the uses and development of the land before and after annexation, if annexation is agreed to by the parties; or

(9) include other lawful terms and considerations the parties consider appropriate.

(b-1) At the time a municipality makes an offer to a landowner to enter into an agreement under this subchapter, the municipality must provide the landowner with a written disclosure that includes:

(1) a statement that the landowner is not required to enter into the agreement;

(2) the authority under which the municipality may annex the land with references to relevant law;

(3) a plain-language description of the annexation procedures applicable to the land;

(4) whether the procedures require the landowner's consent; and

(5) a statement regarding the municipality's waiver of immunity to suit.

(b-2) An agreement for which a disclosure is not provided in accordance with Subsection (b-1) is void.

(c) A contract must:

(1) be in writing;

(2) contain an adequate legal description of the land;

(3) be approved by the governing body of the municipality and the landowner; and

(4) be recorded in the real property records of each county in which any part of the land that is subject to the contract is located.

(d) The total duration of the contract and any successive renewals or extensions may not exceed 45 years.

(e) A municipality in an affected county, as defined by Section 16.341, Water Code, may not enter into a contract that is inconsistent with the model rules adopted under Section 16.343, Water Code.

(f) The contract between the governing body of the municipality and the landowner is binding on the municipality and the landowner and on their respective successors and assigns for the term of the contract. The contract is not binding on, and does not create any encumbrance to title as to, any end-buyer of a fully developed and improved lot within the development, except for land use and development regulations that may apply to a specific lot. Annexation by a municipality of land subject to a contract does not invalidate the enforceability of the contract or infringe on the rights of a party to adjudicate a claim arising under the contract.

(g) A contract:

(1) constitutes a permit under Chapter 245; and

(2) is a program authorized by the legislature under Section 52-a, Article III, Texas Constitution.

(h) A contract between a municipality and a landowner entered into prior to the effective date of this section, or any amendment to this section, and that complies with this section is validated, enforceable, and may be adjudicated subject to the terms and conditions of this subchapter, as amended.

(i) A municipality that enters into a contract waives immunity from suit for the purpose of adjudicating a claim for breach of the contract.

(j) Except as provided by Subsection (k), actual damages, specific performance, or injunctive relief may be granted in an adjudication brought against a municipality for breach of a contract. The total amount of money awarded in an adjudication brought against a municipality for breach of a contract is limited to the following:

(1) the balance due and owed by the municipality under the contract as it may have been amended;

(2) any amount owed by the landowner as a result of the municipality's failure to perform under the contract, including compensation for the increased cost of infrastructure as a result of delays or accelerations caused by the municipality;

(3) reasonable attorney's fees; and

(4) interest as allowed by law, including interest as calculated under Chapter 2251, Government Code.

(k) Damages awarded in an adjudication brought against a municipality for breach of a contract may not include:

(1) consequential damages, except as expressly allowed under Subsection (j)(2); or

(2) exemplary damages.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 522, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 281 (H.B. 1643), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 103 (S.B. 1338), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 678 (H.B. 1929), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 212.173. CERTAIN COASTAL AREAS. This subchapter does not apply to, limit, or otherwise affect any ordinance, order, rule, plan, or standard adopted by this state or a state agency, county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state under the federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. Section 1451 et seq.), and its subsequent amendments, or Subtitle E, Title 2, Natural Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 522, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 212.174. MUNICIPAL UTILITIES. A municipality may not require a contract as a condition for providing water, sewer, electricity, gas, or other utility service from a municipally owned or municipally operated utility that provides any of those services.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 522, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 678 (H.B. 1929), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER H. MULTIFAMILY, HOTEL, AND MOTEL PARKLAND DEDICATION: MUNICIPALITIES WITH POPULATION OF MORE THAN 800,000

Sec. 212.201. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Affordable dwelling unit" means a residential unit offered at a below market rate for rent or sale under a municipal, county, state, or federal program.

(2) "Consumer price index" means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or its successor in function.

(3) "Improvement" and "market value" have the meanings assigned by Section 1.04, Tax Code.

(4) "Land value" means the market value of land per acre, not including an improvement to the land.

(5) "Median family income" means the United States Census Bureau's most recent American Community Survey's five-year estimate of median family income for all families within the applicable municipality.

(6) "Multifamily unit" means a residential unit other than a detached single-family or two-family dwelling.

(7) "Parkland" means an area that is designated as a park for the purpose of recreational activity. The term includes an open space, a recreational facility, and a trail.

(8) "Parkland dedication" means the fee simple transfer of land or the dedication of an easement to a municipality for nonexclusive use as parkland.

(9) "Parkland dedication fee" means a fee imposed by a municipality on a landowner for the acquisition, development, repair, and maintenance of parkland.

(10) "Plan" means a subdivision development plan, subdivision plan, site plan, land development plan, and site development plan each proposing the development of multifamily, hotel, or motel units.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.202. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies only to a municipality with a population of more than 800,000.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.203. CONSTRUCTION. This subchapter may not be construed to prohibit a municipality from requiring by ordinance a landowner to dedicate a portion of the landowner's property for parkland use, impose a parkland dedication fee, or both require the dedication and impose the fee for the development of single-family or two-family uses.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.204. EXCLUSIVE AUTHORITY; LIMITATION. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a municipality has exclusive authority within its boundaries to require the dedication of parkland, impose a parkland dedication fee, or both require the dedication and impose the fee. A municipality may not delegate that authority to another political subdivision.

(b) A municipality may only exercise its authority under this section through a plan application in accordance with this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.205. PARKLAND DEDICATION, FEE, OR COMBINATION. (a) A municipality may require a landowner to dedicate a portion of the landowner's property for parkland use, impose a parkland dedication fee, or both require the dedication and impose the fee under a plan application filed under this subchapter by:

(1) paying a fee set in accordance with Section 212.210(b) or 212.211(b), as applicable; or

(2) dedicating a portion up to the maximum size authorized under Section 212.208 and paying a reduced fee set in accordance with Section 212.210(d) or 212.211(c), as applicable.

(b) A municipality may allow a landowner to elect a parkland dedication, a parkland dedication fee, or a dedication and fee under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.206. REQUEST FOR PARKLAND DEDICATION DETERMINATION. (a) A landowner may, at the landowner's sole discretion, make a written request to a municipality that the municipality make a timely determination of the dedication amount the municipality will impose under the municipality's parkland dedication requirements as applied to the landowner's property being considered for development.

(b) A municipality may make a reasonable written request to the landowner for additional information that is:

(1) publicly and readily available; and

(2) necessary to provide a determination under this section.

(c) A municipality shall respond in writing to a request made under Subsection (a) not later than the 30th day after the date the municipality receives a completed request. If the municipality fails to respond in accordance with this subsection, the municipality may not require a parkland dedication as a condition of approval of a proposed plan or application for property that is the subject of the request.

(d) A parkland dedication determination issued under this section:

(1) is a legally binding determination of the amount of the landowner's parkland dedication for the property that is the subject of the determination; and

(2) is applicable to the property that is the subject of the determination for a period that is the lesser of:

(A) two years; or

(B) the time between the date the determination is issued and the date a plan application is filed that uses or relies on the determination.

(e) A landowner may release in writing a municipality from a determination made under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.207. PARKLAND DEDICATION AUTHORITY. (a) A municipality may not require a parkland dedication, impose a parkland dedication fee, or both require the dedication and impose the fee for any commercial use. For the purpose of this section, a commercial use does not include a multifamily, hotel, or motel use.

(b) If a plan application submitted to a municipality proposes development of the land subject to the application that includes both multifamily, hotel, or motel and commercial uses, the municipality shall determine the amount of a parkland dedication based only on the pro rata portion of the land proposed for multifamily, hotel, or motel use.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.208. LIMITATION ON PARKLAND DEDICATION AMOUNT. A municipality may not require a landowner to dedicate as parkland under this subchapter more than 10 percent, without adjustment or disqualification for impairment, of the gross site area of the land subject to a plan application.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.209. INITIAL REQUIREMENTS FOR DETERMINING FEES. (a) For purposes of determining the amount of a fee imposed under this section, the governing body of a municipality, after providing at least 30 days' public notice and holding a public hearing, shall by official action designate all territory within its municipal boundaries as a suburban area, urban area, or central business district area. The governing body may use the same designation for multiple areas in the municipality. The governing body may amend a designation only during the adoption or amendment of a municipal comprehensive plan under Chapter 213.

(b) Not later than the 10th day after the date the municipality designates its territory under Subsection (a), the municipality shall notify each appraisal district in which the municipality is wholly or partly located of the designation.

(c) Once every 10 years, each appraisal district in which the municipality is wholly or partly located shall calculate and provide to the municipality the average land value for each area or portion of an area designated by the municipality under Subsection (a) that is located in the district.

(d) If multiple appraisal districts calculate an average land value for different portions of an area designated under Subsection (a), the municipality shall determine the area's total average land value by:

(1) multiplying each district's calculated value for the portion located in the district by the percentage, expressed as a fraction, that the portion is to the total area; and

(2) adding the resulting amounts.

(e) In each year other than the year in which an appraisal district calculates average land values under Subsection (c), a municipality shall calculate the average land value for each area designated under Subsection (a) by multiplying the previous year's average land value for the area by one plus the average consumer price index for each month of the previous year.

(f) A municipality shall set the municipality's dwelling unit factor, which reflects the number of parkland acres for each dwelling unit proposed by a plan application. The factor may not be more than:

(1).005 for multifamily units; and

(2).004 for rooms in a hotel or motel ordinarily used for sleeping.

(g) A municipality shall set the municipality's density factor, which reflects the diminishing expectation of parkland acres per dwelling unit in increasingly dense urban environments, for each area designated by the municipality under Subsection (a). The density factor may not be less than:

(1) one for the suburban area;

(2) four for the urban area; and

(3) 40 for the central business district area.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.210. GENERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR CALCULATION OF FEES. (a) This section applies only to a municipality to which Section 212.211 does not apply.

(b) A municipality shall determine the amount of a fee imposed under Section 212.205(a)(1) for land subject to a plan application by:

(1) adding, as appropriate:

(A) the product of the number of multifamily units proposed by the plan by the dwelling unit factor prescribed by Section 212.209(f)(1); and

(B) the product of the number of hotel and motel rooms ordinarily used for sleeping proposed by the plan by the dwelling unit factor prescribed by Section 212.209(f)(2);

(2) multiplying the sum calculated under Subdivision (1) by the average land value for the area in which the land is located; and

(3) dividing the product calculated under Subdivision (2) by the applicable density factor.

(c) For purposes of Subsection (b)(1), a municipality shall exclude from a plan application the number of affordable dwelling units proposed by the plan.

(d) A municipality shall determine the amount of a fee imposed under Section 212.205(a)(2) for land subject to a plan application by:

(1) calculating the amount of the fee for the land under Subsection (b); and

(2) subtracting from the amount calculated under Subdivision (1) the product of the land value applicable to the land and the number of acres dedicated.

(e) If a calculation made under Subsection (d) results in a negative number, the applicable landowner is entitled to receive from the applicable municipality the amount equal to the positive difference between the calculated amount and zero. The municipality shall pay that amount to the landowner at the time of transfer of fee simple title or the recording of the easement.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.211. REQUIREMENTS CALCULATION OF FEES FOR MUNICIPALITIES WITH LOW FEES. (a) This section applies only to a municipality that after August 31, 2023, requires a parkland dedication fee for a multifamily, hotel, or motel development in an amount, calculated on a per dwelling unit basis, not greater than two percent of the median family income.

(b) A municipality to which this section applies may set a parkland dedication fee. If the municipality elects to set the fee in an amount greater than two percent of the municipality's median family income:

(1) this section no longer applies to the municipality; and

(2) the municipality must set the fee in accordance with Section 212.210.

(c) A municipality shall determine the amount of a fee imposed under Section 212.205(a)(2) for land subject to a plan application by subtracting from the amount of the fee set under Subsection (b) the product of the land value applicable to the land and the number of acres dedicated.

(d) If a calculation made under Subsection (c) results in a negative number, the applicable landowner is entitled to receive from the applicable municipality the amount equal to the positive difference between the calculated amount and zero. The municipality shall pay that amount to the landowner at the time of transfer of fee simple title or the recording of the easement.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.212. COLLECTION OF FEES. A municipality shall provide a landowner a written determination of fees owed under this subchapter before approving a plan application but may only collect a fee authorized under this subchapter as a precondition to the issuance of a final certificate of occupancy.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 212.213. APPEAL. (a) A landowner may appeal a determination made by a municipal department, board, or commission regarding any element of a parkland dedication requirement, including amount, orientation, or suitability, as that element applies to the landowner's property, to the municipal planning commission or, if the municipality has no planning commission, the governing body of the municipality. The appeal must include a requested adjudication of the issue in controversy.

(b) A landowner may appeal a municipal planning commission's determination under Subsection (a) to the governing body of the municipality.

(c) In an appeal under this section, a municipal planning commission or governing body of a municipality may uphold, reverse, or modify a parkland dedication requirement as applied to the landowner making the appeal.

(d) A municipal planning commission or governing body of a municipality shall uphold, reverse, or modify a parkland dedication requirement that is the subject of an appeal not later than the 60th day after the date the appeal is filed with the commission or governing body. If the commission or governing body fails to act in accordance with this subsection, the parkland dedication requirement is considered resolved in favor of the landowner's requested adjudication.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 493 (H.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 212.901. DEVELOPER REQUIRED TO PROVIDE SURETY. (a) To ensure that it will not incur liabilities, a municipality may require, before it gives approval of the plans for a development, that the owner of the development provide sufficient surety to guarantee that claims against the development will be satisfied if a default occurs.

(b) This section does not preclude a claimant from seeking recovery by other means.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 48(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 212.902. SCHOOL DISTRICT AND OPEN-ENROLLMENT CHARTER SCHOOL LAND DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS. (a) This section applies to an agreement between a school district or open-enrollment charter school and a municipality which has annexed territory for limited purposes.

(b) On request by a school district or open-enrollment charter school, a municipality shall enter an agreement with the board of trustees of the school district or the governing body of the open-enrollment charter school to establish review fees, review periods, and land development standards ordinances and to provide alternative water pollution control methodologies for school buildings constructed by the school district or open-enrollment charter school. The agreement shall include a provision exempting the district or charter school from all land development ordinances in cases where the district or charter school is adding temporary classroom buildings on an existing school campus.

(c) If the municipality and the school district or open-enrollment charter school do not reach an agreement on or before the 120th day after the date on which the municipality receives the district's or charter school's request for an agreement, proposed agreements by the district or charter school and the municipality shall be submitted to an independent arbitrator appointed by the presiding district judge whose jurisdiction includes the district or charter school. The arbitrator shall, after a hearing at which both the district or charter school and the municipality make presentations on their proposed agreements, prepare an agreement resolving any differences between the proposals. The agreement prepared by the arbitrator will be final and binding upon both the district or charter school and the municipality. The cost of the arbitration proceeding shall be borne equally by the district or charter school and the municipality.

(d) A school district or open-enrollment charter school that requests an agreement under this section, at the time the district or charter school makes the request, shall send a copy of the request to the commissioner of education. At the end of the 120-day period, the requesting district or charter school shall report to the commissioner the status or result of negotiations with the municipality. A municipality may send a separate status report to the commissioner. The district or charter school shall send to the commissioner a copy of each agreement between the district or charter school and a municipality under this section.

(e) An agreement between a municipality and an open-enrollment charter school under Subsection (b) may require that:

(1) any revised land development standards may apply only while the property is used for purposes of the charter school; and

(2) any property in use subject to land development standards established only for an open-enrollment charter school must be brought into compliance with all development regulations applicable to non-school related commercial developments by the property owner after closure or relocation of the charter school.

(f) In this section:

(1) "Land development standards" includes impervious cover limitations, building setbacks, floor to area ratios, building heights and coverage, water quality controls, landscaping, development setbacks, compatibility standards, traffic analyses, including traffic impact analyses, parking requirements, signage requirements, and driveway cuts, if applicable.

(2) "Open-enrollment charter school" means a school granted a charter under Subchapter C, D, or E, Chapter 12, Education Code.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the applicability of or waive fees for fire, safety, health, or building code ordinances of the municipality prior to or during construction of school buildings, nor shall any agreement waive any fee or modify any ordinance of a municipality for an administration, service, or athletic facility proposed for construction by a school district or open-enrollment charter school.

Added by Acts 1990, 71st Leg., 6th C.S., ch. 1, Sec. 3.18, eff. Sept. 1, 1990.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 699 (H.B. 1707), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2023.

Sec. 212.903. CONSTRUCTION AND RENOVATION WORK ON COUNTY-OWNED BUILDINGS OR FACILITIES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only to a county with a population of 250,000 or more.

(b) A municipality is not authorized to require a county to notify the municipality or obtain a building permit for any new construction or renovation work performed within the limits of the municipality by the county's personnel or by county personnel acting as general contractor on county-owned buildings or facilities. Such construction or renovation work shall be inspected by a registered professional engineer or architect licensed in this state in accordance with any other applicable law. A municipality may require a building permit for construction or renovation work performed on county-owned buildings or facilities by private general contractors.

(c) This section does not exempt a county from complying with a municipality's building code standards when performing construction or renovation work.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 271, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 368, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 212.904. APPORTIONMENT OF MUNICIPAL INFRASTRUCTURE COSTS. (a) If a municipality requires, including under an agreement under Chapter 242, as a condition of approval for a property development project that the developer bear a portion of the costs of municipal infrastructure improvements by the making of dedications, the payment of fees, or the payment of construction costs, the developer's portion of the costs may not exceed the amount required for infrastructure improvements that are roughly proportionate to the proposed development as approved by a professional engineer who holds a license issued under Chapter 1001, Occupations Code, and is retained by the municipality. The municipality's determination shall be completed within thirty days following the submission of the developer's application for determination under this subsection.

(b) A developer who disputes the determination made under Subsection (a) may appeal to the governing body of the municipality. At the appeal, the developer may present evidence and testimony under procedures adopted by the governing body. After hearing any testimony and reviewing the evidence, the governing body shall make the applicable determination within 30 days following the final submission of any testimony or evidence by the developer.

(c) A developer may appeal the determination of the governing body to a county or district court of the county in which the development project is located within 30 days of the final determination by the governing body.

(d) A municipality may not require a developer to waive the right of appeal authorized by this section as a condition of approval for a development project.

(e) A developer who prevails in an appeal under this section is entitled to applicable costs and to reasonable attorney's fees, including expert witness fees.

(f) This section does not diminish the authority or modify the procedures specified by Chapter 395.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 982 (H.B. 1835), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (S.B. 1510), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 212.905. REGULATION OF TREE REMOVAL. (a) In this section:

(1) "Residential structure" means:

(A) a manufactured home as that term is defined by Section 1201.003, Occupations Code;

(B) a detached one-family or two-family dwelling, including the accessory structures of the dwelling;

(C) a multiple single-family dwelling that is not more than three stories in height with a separate means of entry for each dwelling, including the accessory structures of the dwelling; or

(D) any other multifamily structure.

(2) "Tree mitigation fee" means a fee or charge imposed by a municipality in connection with the removal of a tree from private property.

(b) A municipality may not require a person to pay a tree mitigation fee for the removed tree if the tree:

(1) is located on a property that is an existing one-family or two-family dwelling that is the person's residence; and

(2) is less than 10 inches in diameter at the point on the trunk 4.5 feet above the ground.

(c) A municipality that imposes a tree mitigation fee for tree removal on a person's property must allow that person to apply for a credit for tree planting under this section to offset the amount of the fee.

(d) An application for a credit under Subsection (c) must be in the form and manner prescribed by the municipality. To qualify for a credit under this section, a tree must be:

(1) planted on property:

(A) for which the tree mitigation fee was assessed; or

(B) mutually agreed upon by the municipality and the person; and

(2) at least two inches in diameter at the point on the trunk 4.5 feet above ground.

(e) For purposes of Subsection (d)(1)(B), the municipality and the person may consult with an academic organization, state agency, or nonprofit organization to identify an area for which tree planting will best address the science-based benefits of trees and other reforestation needs of the municipality.

(f) The amount of a credit provided to a person under this section must be applied in the same manner as the tree mitigation fee assessed against the person and:

(1) equal to the amount of the tree mitigation fee assessed against the person if the property is an existing one-family or two-family dwelling that is the person's residence;

(2) at least 50 percent of the amount of the tree mitigation fee assessed against the person if:

(A) the property is a residential structure or pertains to the development, construction, or renovation of a residential structure; and

(B) the person is developing, constructing, or renovating the property not for use as the person's residence; or

(3) at least 40 percent of the amount of the tree mitigation fee assessed against the person if:

(A) the property is not a residential structure; or

(B) the person is constructing or intends to construct a structure on the property that is not a residential structure.

(g) As long as the municipality meets the requirement to provide a person a credit under Subsection (c), this section does not affect the ability of or require a municipality to determine:

(1) the type of trees that must be planted to receive a credit under this section, except as provided by Subsection (d);

(2) the requirements for tree removal and corresponding tree mitigation fees, if applicable;

(3) the requirements for tree-planting methods and best management practices to ensure that the tree grows to the anticipated height at maturity; or

(4) the amount of a tree mitigation fee.

(h) A municipality may not prohibit the removal of or impose a tree mitigation fee for the removal of a tree that:

(1) is diseased or dead; or

(2) poses an imminent or immediate threat to persons or property.

(i) This section does not apply to property within five miles of a federal military base in active use as of December 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 7 (H.B. 7), Sec. 1, eff. December 1, 2017.

Sec. 212.906. CERTAIN VALUE-BASED FEES AND DISCLOSURE OF CERTAIN INFORMATION PROHIBITED. (a) This section applies only to an application, review, engineering, inspection, acceptance, administrative, or other fee imposed by a municipality related to the acceptance, review, or processing of engineering or construction plans or for the inspection of improvements for construction of a subdivision or lot or a related improvement associated with or required in conjunction with that construction.

(b) A municipality may not consider the cost of constructing or improving the public infrastructure for a subdivision, lot, or related property development in determining the amount of a fee subject to this section. The municipality shall determine the fee by considering the municipality's actual cost to, as applicable, review and process the engineering or construction plan or to inspect the public infrastructure improvement.

(c) In determining the municipality's actual cost for reviewing and processing an engineering or construction plan or inspecting a public infrastructure improvement under Subsection (b), a municipality may consider:

(1) the fee that would be charged by a qualified, independent third-party entity for those services;

(2) the hourly rate for the estimated actual direct time of the municipality's employees performing those services; or

(3) the actual costs assessed to the municipality by a third-party entity that provides those services to the municipality.

(d) A municipality may not require the disclosure of information related to the value of or cost of constructing or improving a residential dwelling or the public infrastructure improvements for a subdivision, lot, or related property development as a condition of obtaining approval for subdivision construction or for the acceptance of those public infrastructure improvements except as required by the Federal Emergency Management Agency for participation in the National Flood Insurance Program.

(e) A municipality that imposes a fee for reviewing or processing an engineering or construction plan or inspecting a public infrastructure improvement shall annually publish the fee and the hourly rate and estimated direct time incurred by municipal employees for a fee calculated under Subsection (c)(2). The municipality must publish the information:

(1) on the municipality's Internet website; or

(2) if the municipality does not maintain an Internet website, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the municipality is primarily located.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 534 (H.B. 3492), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.